Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.3 Drug Abuse Reporting System

21-28.3-1.
Drug abuse reporting system established.

The director of health, or the director’s designee, shall establish and maintain a drug abuse reporting system to compile relevant statistics of incidents of drug abuse, for the purpose of aiding and assisting health and social service agencies, public and private, in the treatment and rehabilitation of victims of drug abuse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 28, § 6.

21-28.3-2.
Contents of statistics.

The statistics shall include, but not be limited to, the age, sex, occupation, background, and degree of apparent dependency of the individual involved, and the nature and type of drug involved, according to forms and regulations established by the director, which forms and regulations are exempted from the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42. All hospitals, physicians, and state and local law enforcement agencies shall be required to report, on a monthly basis, the facts and circumstances of incidents of drug abuse to the department of health in accordance with the reporting system established by the director of the department of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 263, § 1.

21-28.3-3.
Confidentiality.

In the maintenance, compilation, and providing of the statistics, the director of health, the hospitals, and the physicians shall maintain a confidentiality with respect to the identity of the individuals involved except where ordered to the contrary by any court of competent jurisdiction in the state; that confidentiality shall not extend to the records and files of the law enforcement agencies, except insofar as the confidentiality is protected under other provisions of the general laws, or otherwise. The director is authorized to provide any public or private drug control agency or social service agency with the compilation and detail of the statistics described in §§

21-28.3-1

and

21-28.3-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 263, § 1.

21-28.3-4.
Breach of confidentiality.

Any person who directly or indirectly violates or conspires to violate the confidentiality provisions of §

21-28.3-3

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a sentence of up to six (6) months in jail and/or a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 263, § 1.